Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

General Provisions

62-2-101. Registration.

In order to safeguard life, health and property and to promote public welfare, by requiring that only properly qualified persons shall practice architecture, engineering and landscape architecture, or use the title “registered interior designer” in this state, any person practicing architecture, engineering or landscape architecture or using the title “registered interior designer” shall be registered as provided in this chapter, and it is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice architecture, engineering or landscape architecture, or use the title “registered interior designer” unless the person has been duly registered under this chapter, except as otherwise provided.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-201; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 1; 1991, ch. 164, § 8; 1997, ch. 33, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1997, ch. 33, validated the substitution of “registered interior designer” for “interior designer” throughout this chapter, as amended by Acts 1995, ch. 113, and made such language retroactive to April 19, 1995.

Compiler's Notes. The offense in this section may be affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989, compiled in title 40, chapter 35. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111, 62-2-105.

The former chapter (Acts 1975, ch. 247, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (8); 1977, ch. 358, § 1; 1978, ch. 608, § 1; ch. 753, § 1; ch. 906, § 9) was repealed by Acts 1978, ch. 906, § 10 and by Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 40, and the present chapter on the same subject substituted therefor.

Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 26 provided that the requirement of a person to register to obtain a certificate of registration to use the title “interior designer” (now “registered interior designer”) shall not take effect until January 1, 1994.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Violations and penalties, § 62-2-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, §§ 8, 23; 19 Tenn. Juris., Negligence, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Monetary limitations in Tennessee Contractor's Liability Act, OAG 93-12, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/11/93).

The Board of Architectural and Engineering Examiners had authority to adopt policies such as those set forth on the board's internet web site, which for the most part were comprised of policies that clarified the meaning of statutory provisions or explained various practices of the board, and in a publication entitled “Tennessee Board of Architectural And Engineering Examiners Reference Manual for Building Officials and Design Professionals,” which contained a summary of the registration statutes as well as some of the Internet Policies, and also included a section that addressed questions often asked by building officials, OAG 00-119, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 121 (7/10/00).

62-2-102. Practice and persons exempt from registration.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d), nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring registration for the purpose of practicing architecture, engineering or landscape architecture by a person; provided, that the person does not use the appellation “architect,” “engineer” or “landscape architect,” an appellation that compounds, modifies or qualifies the word “architecture,” “engineering” or “landscape architecture,” or that gives or is designed to give the impression that the person using those words is an architect, engineer or landscape architect.

It is unlawful for any person other than a registered architect or engineer to prepare plans and specifications for any building or structure other than the following:

Structures classified as business, factory-industrial, hazardous, mercantile, residential and storage occupancies, as those occupancies are defined in the 1985 edition of the Standard Building Code, that are:

Less than three (3) stories in height; and

Less than five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.) in total gross area;

One-family and two-family dwellings and domestic outbuildings appurtenant to those dwellings;

Farm buildings not designed or intended for human occupancy; or

Signs that do not exceed either of the following limits:

Any portion of the sign is twenty feet (20') or more above the ground level; or

Any portion of the sign is fifteen feet (15') or more above the ground level, if the sign has more than one hundred twenty square feet (120 sq. ft.) in total sign face area;

Subdivision (b)(4)(A) shall not apply if, in the opinion of the local government building official, failure of the support system for the sign is likely to cause harm to people or property.

Nothing in this section shall prevent any awarding authority, public or private, from requiring the services of a registered architect, engineer or landscape architect for any project.

Any person, firm, company, business, corporation or other entity that was organized and doing business other than business regulated in this chapter that was organized and doing business prior to January 1, 1967, and whose corporate name includes the appellation “engineer” or an appellation that compounds, modifies or qualifies the word “engineering,” may continue to use that corporate name and shall not be required to register pursuant to this chapter. This section shall not be construed to authorize those entities to engage in the practice of architecture, engineering or landscape architecture without registering pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 29; T.C.A., § 62-229; Acts 1983, ch. 47, § 1; 1988, ch. 990, § 2; 1989, ch. 307, § 1; 1993, ch. 132, § 1; 2009, ch. 268, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The offense in this section may be affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111, 62-2-105.

Cross-References. Violations and penalties, § 62-2-105.

Attorney General Opinions. Interpretation and enforcement of this section, OAG 99-226, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 230 (12/3/99).

The board of architectural and engineering examiners had authority to adopt a policy named “Seal Exemptions Clarification (Section 62-2-102(b)),” as the policy simply addressed a common situation in the construction industry which the statute did not explicitly address, OAG 00-119, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 121 (7/10/00).

Interior design by non-registrants under T.C.A. §§ 62-2-101—62-2-906. OAG 12-46, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (4/3/12).

62-2-103. Persons exempt from chapter.

The following shall be exempted from this chapter; provided, that, except as provided in subdivision (4), nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting any person who makes public use of the title “engineer,” “architect” or “landscape architect” or any appellation of those titles, including persons employed by this state or its political subdivisions:

Any person engaging in architectural, engineering or landscape architectural work as an employee of a registered architect, registered engineer or registered landscape architect; provided, that such work may not include responsible charge of design or supervision;

Architects, engineers or landscape architects who are not residents of and have no established place of business in this state, who are acting as consulting associates of an architect, engineer or landscape architect registered under this chapter; provided, that the nonresident is qualified for such professional service in the nonresident's own state or country;

Architects, engineers or landscape architects who are employed by a person, firm or corporation not engaged in the practice of architecture, engineering, or landscape architecture and who render architectural, engineering or landscape architectural services to their employer only and not to the general public; and

Architects, engineers or landscape architects who are employed by a municipal electric system or electric and community service cooperative as defined in § 65-34-102 or telephone cooperatives as defined in title 65, chapter 29 and who render architectural, engineering or landscape architectural services pertaining to the operations of their employer and who do not offer their services to the general public in exchange for compensation other than that received from their employer. Nothing in this subdivision (4) shall be construed as exempting any person who makes public use of the title “engineer,” “architect” or “landscape architect” or any appellation of those titles.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 30; T.C.A., § 62-230; Acts 1988, ch. 990, §§ 3-5; 1989, ch. 307, §§ 2, 3; 1993, ch. 132, § 2; 1994, ch. 644, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 113, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Licensure of professional engineers, OAG 94-111, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (10/6/94).

62-2-104. Employees of licensees.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the drafters, students, clerks of the work superintendents and other employees of lawfully practicing architects, engineers and landscape architects under this chapter from acting under the instruction, control or supervision of the employer or to prevent the employment of superintendents on the construction, enlargement or alterations of buildings or any appurtenance to buildings, or prevent such superintendents from acting under the immediate personal supervision of registered architects, registered engineers or registered landscape architects by whom the plans and specifications of the building enlargements, constructions or alterations were prepared.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent persons, mechanics or builders from making plans, specifications for or supervising the erection, enlargement or alterations of buildings or any appurtenance to buildings, to be constructed by themselves or their employees exclusively for their own use and occupancy, unless the same involves the public health or safety; provided, that the working drawings for such constructions are signed by the authors of the drawings and their true appellations as “contractor,” “carpenter,” etc., without the use in any form of the title “architect,” “engineer” or “landscape architect.”

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 31; T.C.A., § 62-231; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 6.

62-2-105. Violations — Penalties — Reporting offenses.

No person shall:

Present or attempt to file as the person's own the certificate of registration of another;

Give forged or willfully false evidence of any kind to the state board of examiners for architects and engineers or any member of the board for the purpose of obtaining a certificate;

Falsely impersonate any other practitioner; or

Use or attempt to use an expired or revoked certificate of registration.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class B misdemeanor.

No person shall practice or offer to practice engineering, architecture or landscape architecture, or use the title “registered interior designer” in this state in violation of this chapter.

A violation of subdivision (b)(1) is a Class B misdemeanor.

Each day's violation of subdivision (b)(1) is a separate offense.

A person is construed to practice or offer to practice engineering, architecture or landscape architecture who, by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card or in any other way, represents that person to be an architect, engineer or landscape architect, with or without qualifying adjective, or through the use of some other title implies that the person is an architect, engineer or landscape architect.

It is the duty of the members of the board to report any violations of this chapter to the proper authorities.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 34; 1980, ch. 627, § 5; T.C.A., § 62-234; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 7; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 164, § 9; 1997, ch. 33, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 26 provided that the requirement of a person to register to obtain a certificate of registration to use the title “interior designer” (now “registered interior designer”) shall not take effect until January 1, 1994.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-2-106. Enforcement.

It is the duty of the state board of examiners for architects and engineers to inquire into the identity of any person claiming to be an architect, engineer, landscape architect or registered interior designer and to prosecute any person or persons violating this chapter.

The board may, when it deems appropriate, seek civil remedies at law or equity to restrain or enjoin any unauthorized practice or other violation of this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 35; T.C.A., § 62-235; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 8; 1991, ch. 164, § 10; 1997, ch. 33, § 3.

62-2-107. Employment of licensees on public works — Excluded public works.

Neither the state, nor any county, city, town or village or other political subdivision of the state, shall engage in the construction or maintenance of any public work involving architecture, engineering or landscape architecture for which the plans, specifications and estimates have not been made by a registered architect, registered engineer or registered landscape architect.

Nothing in this section shall be held to apply to such public work if:

The contemplated expenditure for the complete project does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), and the work does not alter the structural, mechanical or electrical system of the project; or

The contemplated expenditure for the complete project does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the project is located in a state park, and the work is solely maintenance, as defined in the policy and procedures of the state building commission.

For a public work located in a state park, existing plans may be used as a basis of design if the plans have been designed and sealed by a registered architect, engineer, or landscape architect and a registered architect, engineer, or landscape architect reviews such plans for compliance with all applicable codes and standards and appropriateness for the site conditions of the project, makes changes if required, and seals the plans in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

For the purposes of this chapter, “public work” does not include construction, reconstruction or renovation of all or any part of an electric distribution system owned or operated directly or through a board by a municipality, county, power district or other subdivision of this state that is to be constructed, reconstructed or renovated according to specifications established in the American National Standard Electrical Safety Code, the National Electrical Code or other recognized specifications governing design and construction requirements for such facilities. Notwithstanding this subsection (c), “electrical distribution system” does not include any office buildings, warehouses or other structures containing walls and a roof that are to be open to the general public.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 36; T.C.A., § 62-236; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 9; 1994, ch. 644, § 3; 2012, ch. 927, § 1; 2015, ch. 403, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 927, § 2 provided that the act, which amended subsection (b), shall apply to plans, specifications, or estimates created for public works on or after July 1, 2012.

62-2-108. Hearings and judicial review.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 451, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-237.

62-2-109. Voluntary inspection services by architects or engineers at scene of a natural or man-made emergency — Limitation of liability — Applicability and scope of limitation.

An architect or engineer who voluntarily, without compensation or expectation of compensation, provides structural or building systems inspection services at the scene of a declared national, state or local natural or man-made emergency at the request of a public safety officer or city or county building inspector acting in an official capacity shall not be liable in negligence for any personal injury or property damage caused by the architect's or engineer's good faith, but negligent, inspection of a structure used for human habitation or a structure owned by a public entity, for structural integrity or nonstructural elements affecting life and safety. The immunity provided by this section shall apply only for an inspection that occurs within ninety (90) days of the declared national, state or local natural or man-made emergency.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide immunity for gross negligence or willful misconduct.

As used in this section, “public safety officer” means:

The chief law enforcement officer in a county or city;

A law enforcement officer acting at the specific direction of the chief law enforcement officer; or

The director or the director's assistants of the emergency management agency designated in accordance with § 58-2-104.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as extending immunity to a city or county for whom inspection services are provided as described in this section.

Acts 1991, ch. 267, § 1; 2006, ch. 937, § 3.

62-2-110. Exemptions from part.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any person in business in Tennessee in 1998 for the sole purpose of manufacturing and distributing federal aviation administration-approved avionic equipment is exempt from this part.

Acts 2010, ch. 945, § 1.